Hawaii statutes.
§501-264 Chain of title
of deregistered land. (a) The chain of record title in the registered
owner of any estate or interest in deregistered land shall, as of the date and
time of deregistration, be subject only to the following and to the items
described in subsection (d):

(1) In the case of land other than a fee time share
interest, the estates, mortgages, liens, charges, instruments, documents, and
papers noted on the certificate of title recorded in the bureau of conveyances
pursuant to chapter 502 and part II of this chapter;

(2) In the case of a fee time share interest covered
by a certified fee time share interest certificate of title, the estates,
mortgages, liens, charges, instruments, documents, and papers noted on the
certified fee time share interest certificate of title; and

(3) In the case of a fee time share interest covered
by an uncertified fee time share interest certificate of title, the estates,
mortgages, liens, charges, instruments, documents, and papers noted or deemed
to be noted on the uncertified fee time share interest certificate of title, as
set forth in subsection (b).

(b) The following shall, for purposes of part
II of this chapter, be deemed to be noted on the uncertified fee time share
interest certificate of title for a given fee time share interest:

(1) The estates, mortgages, liens, charges,
instruments, documents, and papers noted in the last certificate of title
certified by the assistant registrar for the registered land of that fee time
share interest; and

(2) The estates, mortgages, liens, charges,
instruments, documents, and papers registered with respect to the registered
land of that fee time share interest, which registration occurred:

(A) After the date of certification of the
last certified certificate of title for the registered land of the fee time
share interest; and

(B) Prior to the earlier to occur of: the
date and time of cancellation of the fee time share interest certificate of
title; or July 1, 2012, including but not limited to any estates, liens,
charges, covenants, conditions, easements, restrictions, agreements,
reservations, limitations, interests, or other continuing provisions contained
or reserved in the deed conveying the fee time share interest to the registered
owner, whether or not identified in the uncertified fee time share interest
certificate of title.

(c) Nothing in subsection (b) is intended to
alter the effect of any instruments, documents, or papers identified in
subsection (b)(2) on the items noted in the certificate of title described in
subsection (b)(1).

(d) As of the date and time of deregistration,
the chain of title for deregistered land shall be subject only to the items
described in subsection (a) and, in the case of a fee time share interest
covered by an uncertified fee time share interest certificate of title, in
subsection (b), and to the following:

(1) The estates, mortgages, liens, charges,
instruments, documents, and papers:

(A) Noted on the certificate of title
recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant to chapter 502 and part II of
this chapter, in the case of land other than a fee time share interest;

(B) Noted on the certified fee time share
interest certificate of title, in the case of a fee time share interest for
which the assistant registrar issued a certified fee time share interest
certificate of title; or

(C) Noted or deemed to be noted on the
uncertified fee time share interest certificate of title, in the case of all
other fee time share interests;

(2) Liens, claims, or rights arising or existing
under the laws or Constitution of the United States, which the statutes of this
State cannot require to appear of record in the registry; provided that notices
of liens for internal revenue taxes payable to the United States, and
certificates affecting the liens, shall be deemed to fall within this paragraph
only if the same are recorded in the bureau of conveyances as provided by
chapter 505;

(3) Unpaid real property taxes assessed against the
land and improvements covered by the certificate of title for the deregistered
land, with interest, penalties, and other additions to the tax, which, unless a
notice is filed and registered as provided by county real property tax
ordinance, shall be for the period of three years from and after the date on
which the lien attached, and if proceedings for the enforcement or foreclosure
of the tax lien are brought within the period, until the termination of the
proceedings or the completion of the tax sale;

(4) State tax liens, if the same are recorded in the
bureau of conveyances as provided by section 231-33;

(5) Any public highway, or any private way laid out
under the provisions of law, when the certificate of title does not state that
the boundary of the way has been determined;

(6) Any lease, coupled with occupancy, for a term not
exceeding one year; provided that the priority of the unrecorded lease shall
attach only at the date of the commencement of the unrecorded lease and expire
one year from the date or sooner if so expressed;

(7) Any liability to assessments for betterments, or
statutory liability that may attach to land as a lien prior to or independent
of, the recording or registering of any paper of the possibility of a lien for
labor or material furnished in the improvement of the land; provided that the
priority of any liability and the lien therefor (other than for labor and
material furnished in the improvement of the land, which shall be governed by
section 507-43) shall cease and terminate three years after the liability first
accrues unless notice thereof, signed by the officer charged with collection of
the assessments or liability, setting forth the amount claimed, the date of
accrual, and the land affected, is recorded in the bureau of conveyances
pursuant to chapter 502 within the three-year period; and provided further that
if there are easements or other rights, appurtenant to a parcel of deregistered
land, which for any reason have failed to be deregistered, the easements or
rights shall remain so appurtenant notwithstanding the failure, and shall be
held to pass with the deregistered land until cut off or extinguished in any
lawful manner;

(8) The possibility of reversal or vacation of the
decree of registration upon appeal;

(9) Any encumbrance not required to be registered as
provided in sections 501-241 to 501-248 and relating to a leasehold time share
interest or leasehold interest in deregistered land; and

(10) Child support liens that are created pursuant to
order or judgment filed through judicial or administrative proceeding in this
State or in any other state, the recording of which shall be as provided by
chapter 576D.

(e) For purposes of this section, an
encumbrance shall be deemed sufficiently noted on a certificate of title if the
notation:

(1) References a document by name or number that
contains an encumbrance; and

(2) Indicates that the referenced document contains
an encumbrance to which the deregistered land is subject.

(f) All instruments, documents, and papers:
noted on a certificate of title recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant
to chapter 502 and part II of this chapter (in the case of land other than a
fee time share interest); noted on a certified fee time share interest
certificate of title; or noted or deemed to be noted on an uncertified fee time
share interest certificate [of] title, shall have the same force and effect as
if they had been recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant to chapter 502
as of the date, hour, and minute of reception noted on the certificate of title
pursuant to section 501-107 or otherwise entered or required to be entered in
the record of the assistant registrar pursuant to section 501-107; provided
that:

(1) No instrument, document, or paper shall have any
greater or other effect after the certificate of title is recorded in the
bureau of conveyances pursuant to chapter 502 and part II of this chapter, as
constructive notice or otherwise, than it had or acquired at the time it was
registered pursuant to this chapter or made; and

(2) Nothing in this part shall be construed as giving
any greater or other effect, as constructive notice or otherwise, to any
instrument, document, or paper recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant
to chapter 502 prior to the date and time of deregistration of any registered
land, than was provided by the laws of this State (including this chapter and
other laws regarding registered land) in effect at the time the instrument,
document, or paper was recorded.

(g) If a certificate of title for:

(1) Land other than a fee time share interest
recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant to chapter 502 and part II of
this chapter;

(2) A fee time share interest certified by the
assistant registrar; or

(3) A fee time share interest that has not been
certified by the assistant registrar,

relates to more than one fee time share interest or
more than one interest in other deregistered land, then subsections (a) to (d)
shall apply to each interest separately and only those items described in
subsections (a) to (d) that encumbered a particular interest as of the date and
time of deregistration of that interest will continue to encumber that interest
after the date and time of deregistration. [L 2009, c 120, pt of §2, §21; am L
2012, c 121, §6; am L 2013, c 119, §§8, 11; am L 2016, c 215, §6]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next